Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,103
Hospital authority; bonds; maturity; interest.

The bonds of the authority shall be authorized by its resolution and shall be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, not exceeding sixty years from their respective dates, bear interest at such rate or rates, payable annually or semiannually, be in such denominations, which may be made interchangeable, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places either within or without the state, and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution or its trust indenture may provide.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.103.